New York, session 2025-2026, A7214.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph 1 of subdivision g of section 26-405 of the 2 administrative code of the city of New York is amended by adding a new 3 subparagraph (g-1) to read as follows: 4 (g-1) No increase for major capital improvements shall be granted to 5 any landlord or property owner, unless an application including all 6 necessary documentation are submitted within one hundred twenty days 7 after the completion of the new installation or improvement or improve- 8 ments; or 9 § 2. Paragraph 6 of subdivision c of section 26-511 of the administra- 10 tive code of the city of New York, as separately amended by section 12 11 of part K of chapter 36 and section 28 of part Q of chapter 39 of the 12 laws of 2019, is amended to read as follows: 13 (6) provides criteria whereby the commissioner may act upon applica- 14 tions by owners for increases in excess of the level of fair rent 15 increase established under this law provided, however, that such crite- 16 ria shall provide (a) as to hardship applications, for a finding that 17 the level of fair rent increase is not sufficient to enable the owner to 18 maintain approximately the same average annual net income (which shall 19 be computed without regard to debt service, financing costs or manage- 20 ment fees) for the three year period ending on or within six months of 21 the date of an application pursuant to such criteria as compared with 22 annual net income, which prevailed on the average over the period nine- 23 teen hundred sixty-eight through nineteen hundred seventy, or for the EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07253-01-5 A. 7214 2 1 first three years of operation if the building was completed since nine- 2 teen hundred sixty-eight or for the first three fiscal years after a 3 transfer of title to a new owner provided the new owner can establish to 4 the satisfaction of the commissioner that [he or she] such owner 5 acquired title to the building as a result of a bona fide sale of the 6 entire building and that the new owner is unable to obtain requisite 7 records for the fiscal years nineteen hundred sixty-eight through nine- 8 teen hundred seventy despite diligent efforts to obtain same from prede- 9 cessors in title and further provided that the new owner can provide 10 financial data covering a minimum of six years under [his or her] their 11 continuous and uninterrupted operation of the building to meet the three 12 year to three year comparative test periods herein provided; and (b) as 13 to completed building-wide major capital improvements, for a finding 14 that such improvements are deemed depreciable under the Internal Revenue 15 Code and that the cost is to be amortized over a twelve-year period for 16 a building with thirty-five or fewer housing accommodations, or a twelve 17 and one-half-year period for a building with more than thirty-five hous- 18 ing accommodations, for any determination issued by the division of 19 housing and community renewal after the effective date of the [the] 20 chapter of the laws of two thousand nineteen that amended this paragraph 21 and shall be removed from the legal regulated rent thirty years from the 22 date the increase became effective inclusive of any increases granted by 23 the applicable rent guidelines board. Temporary major capital improve- 24 ment increases shall be collectible prospectively on the first day of 25 the first month beginning sixty days from the date of mailing notice of 26 approval to the tenant. Such notice shall disclose the total monthly 27 increase in rent and the first month in which the tenant would be 28 required to pay the temporary increase. An approval for a temporary 29 major capital improvement increase shall not include retroactive 30 payments. The collection of any increase shall not exceed two percent in 31 any year from the effective date of the order granting the increase over 32 the rent set forth in the schedule of gross rents, with collectability 33 of any dollar excess above said sum to be spread forward in similar 34 increments and added to the rent as established or set in future years. 35 Upon vacancy, the landlord may add any remaining balance of the tempo- 36 rary major capital improvement increase to the legal regulated rent. 37 Notwithstanding any other provision of the law, for any renewal lease 38 commencing on or after June 14, 2019, the collection of any rent 39 increases due to any major capital improvements approved on or after 40 June 16, 2012 and before June 16, 2019 shall not exceed two percent in 41 any year for any tenant in occupancy on the date the major capital 42 improvement was approved or based upon cash purchase price exclusive of 43 interest or service charges. Where an application for a temporary major 44 capital improvement increase has been filed, a tenant shall have sixty 45 days from the date of mailing of a notice of a proceeding in which to 46 answer or reply. The state division of housing and community renewal 47 shall provide any responding tenant with the reasons for the division's 48 approval or denial of such application. Notwithstanding anything to the 49 contrary contained herein, no hardship increase granted pursuant to this 50 paragraph shall, when added to the annual gross rents, as determined by 51 the commissioner, exceed the sum of, (i) the annual operating expenses, 52 (ii) an allowance for management services as determined by the commis- 53 sioner, (iii) actual annual mortgage debt service (interest and amorti- 54 zation) on its indebtedness to a lending institution, an insurance 55 company, a retirement fund or welfare fund which is operated under the 56 supervision of the banking or insurance laws of the state of New York or A. 7214 3 1 the United States, and (iv) eight and one-half percent of that portion 2 of the fair market value of the property which exceeds the unpaid prin- 3 cipal amount of the mortgage indebtedness referred to in subparagraph 4 (iii) of this paragraph. Fair market value for the purposes of this 5 paragraph shall be six times the annual gross rent. The collection of 6 any increase in the stabilized rent for any apartment pursuant to this 7 paragraph shall not exceed six percent in any year from the effective 8 date of the order granting the increase over the rent set forth in the 9 schedule of gross rents, with collectability of any dollar excess above 10 said sum to be spread forward in similar increments and added to the 11 stabilized rent as established or set in future years. No increase for 12 major capital improvements shall be granted to any landlord or property 13 owner, unless an application including all necessary documentation is 14 submitted within one hundred twenty days after the completion of the new 15 installation or improvement or improvements; 16 § 3. Subdivision b of section 4 of section 4 of chapter 576 of the 17 laws of 1974, constituting the emergency tenant protection act of nine- 18 teen seventy-four, is amended by adding a new paragraph 4 to read as 19 follows: 20 (4) no increase for major capital improvements shall be granted to any 21 landlord or property owner, unless an application including all neces- 22 sary documentation is submitted within one hundred twenty days after the 23 completion of the new installation or improvement or improvements; 24 § 4. Subparagraph 7 of the second undesignated paragraph of paragraph 25 (a) of subdivision 4 of section 4 of chapter 274 of the laws of 1946, 26 constituting the emergency housing rent control law, as separately 27 amended by section 25 of part Q of chapter 39 and section 14 of part K 28 of chapter 36 of the laws of 2019, is amended to read as follows: 29 (7) there has been since March first, nineteen hundred fifty, a major 30 capital improvement essential for the preservation, energy efficiency, 31 functionality, or infrastructure of the entire building, improvement of 32 the structure including heating, windows, plumbing and roofing, but 33 shall not be for operational costs or unnecessary cosmetic improvements; 34 which for any order of the commissioner issued after the effective date 35 of the chapter of the laws of two thousand nineteen that amended this 36 paragraph the cost of such improvement shall be amortized over a twelve- 37 year period for buildings with thirty-five or fewer units or a twelve 38 and one-half year period for buildings with more than thirty-five units, 39 and shall be removed from the legal regulated rent thirty years from the 40 date the increase became effective inclusive of any increases granted by 41 the applicable rent guidelines board. Temporary major capital improve- 42 ment increases shall be collectible prospectively on the first day of 43 the first month beginning sixty days from the date of mailing notice of 44 approval to the tenant. Such notice shall disclose the total monthly 45 increase in rent and the first month in which the tenant would be 46 required to pay the temporary increase. An approval for a temporary 47 major capital improvement increase shall not include retroactive 48 payments. The collection of any increase shall not exceed two percent in 49 any year from the effective date of the order granting the increase over 50 the rent set forth in the schedule of gross rents, with collectability 51 of any dollar excess above said sum to be spread forward in similar 52 increments and added to the rent as established or set in future years. 53 Upon vacancy, the landlord may add any remaining balance of the tempo- 54 rary major capital improvement increase to the legal regulated rent. 55 Notwithstanding any other provision of the law, for any renewal lease 56 commencing on or after June 14, 2019, the collection of any rent A. 7214 4 1 increases due to any major capital improvements approved on or after 2 June 16, 2012 and before June 16, 2019 shall not exceed two percent in 3 any year for any tenant in occupancy on the date the major capital 4 improvement was approved; provided, however, where an application for a 5 temporary major capital improvement increase has been filed, a tenant 6 shall have sixty days from the date of mailing of a notice of a proceed- 7 ing in which to answer or reply. The state division of housing and 8 community renewal shall provide any responding tenant with the reasons 9 for the division's approval or denial of such application. No increase 10 for major capital improvements shall be granted to any landlord or prop- 11 erty owner, unless an application including all necessary documentation 12 is submitted within one hundred twenty days after the completion of the 13 new installation or improvement or improvements; or 14 § 5. This act shall take effect immediately; provided that: 15 a. the amendments to section 26-405 of the city rent and rehabili- 16 tation law made by section one of this act shall remain in full force 17 and effect only as long as the public emergency requiring the regulation 18 and control of residential rents and evictions continues, as provided in 19 subdivision 3 of section 1 of the local emergency housing rent control 20 act; and 21 b. the amendments to section 26-511 of the administrative code of the 22 city of New York made by section two of this act shall not affect the 23 expiration of such section and shall be deemed to expire therewith.